Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 2
MERGER AND CONVERSION OF ENTITIES

Editor's note:

This article was added in 1997, and this part 2 was subsequently repealed and reenacted in 2000, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this part 2 prior to 2000, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

7-90-201. Conversion of an entity.

Pursuant to a plan of conversion that complies with section 7-90-201.3 and is approved in accordance with section 7-90-201.4:

A domestic entity of one form may convert into any other form of domestic entity.

A domestic entity may convert into any form of foreign entity recognized in the jurisdiction under the law of which the entity will be considered to have been formed after the conversion.

A foreign entity may convert into a domestic entity if the conversion is not prohibited by the constituent documents or organic statutes of the foreign entity and if the foreign entity complies with all of the requirements, if any, of its constituent documents and organic statutes in effecting the conversion.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire part R&RE, p. 966, § 46, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

IP(5) amended, p. 1838, § 88, effective July 1; IP(5) amended, p. 1702, § 86, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(1), (2), (3), (4)(a), (4)(c)(II), (5), and (6) amended, p. 2285, § 195, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(2), (3), (4), (5), and (6) amended and (5.5) added, p. 1470, § 203, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(1) and (5.5) amended, p. 1206, § 5, effective October 1.

L. 2006:

(2), (4)(b), (4)(c)(III), (4)(c)(IV), IP(5), (5)(b), and (5.5) amended and (4)(c)(III.3), (4)(c)(III.7), and (5.3) added, pp. 866, 868, §§ 42, 43, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 229, § 21, effective May 29.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1911, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-90-201 as it existed prior to 2000.

7-90-201.3. Plan of conversion.

A plan of conversion must state:

The entity name or, for an entity that has no entity name, the true name, the jurisdiction under the law of which the entity is formed, and the form of entity of the converting entity;

The entity name or, for an entity that has no entity name, the true name, the jurisdiction under the law of which the entity is formed, and the form of the resulting entity;

The terms and conditions of the conversion, including the manner and basis of changing the owner's interests of the converting entity into owner's interests or obligations of the resulting entity or into money or other property in whole or in part.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 232, § 22, effective May 29.

L. 2019:

IP(1) and (1)(c) amended, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1912, § 3, effective July 1, 2020.

L. 2022:

(1)(c) amended, (HB 22-1250), ch. 80, p. 396, § 1, effective August 10.

7-90-201.4. Approval of plan of conversion.

In the case of domestic entities described in this subsection (1), the plan of conversion must be approved:

In the case of a corporation, as provided in section 7-111-103;

In the case of a nonprofit corporation, as provided in section 7-131-102;

In the case of a cooperative formed under, or subject to, article 56 of this title 7, as provided in section 7-56-602; and

In the case of a cooperative formed under article 55 of this title 7, as provided in section 7-55-112.

In the case of a domestic entity other than an entity described in subsection (1) of this section, the plan of conversion must be approved as follows:

If the primary constituent documents expressly provide for the approval of the plan of conversion, it must be approved in accordance with those provisions.

If subsection (2)(a) of this section does not apply, the plan of conversion must be approved in accordance with the provisions of the primary constituent documents that contain the most stringent terms for the approval of a plan of merger.

If subsections (2)(a) and (2)(b) of this section do not apply, the plan of conversion must be approved in accordance with the provisions of the primary constituent documents that contain the most stringent terms for the approval of an amendment to the primary constituent documents or, if no such provisions exist, the provisions of the organic statutes that contain the most stringent terms for the approval of an amendment to the primary constituent documents.

If subsections (2)(a), (2)(b), and (2)(c) of this section do not apply, the plan of conversion must be approved by all of the owners of the converting entity.

For purposes of this section, the provisions of the organic statutes and constituent documents applicable to approval include provisions relating to any preliminary approval by managers for submission to the owners, notices, quorum, voting, and consent by owners or third parties. References in this section to the most stringent provisions of the primary constituent documents or organic statutes are references to those provisions of the documents or statutes that establish the highest voting requirements.

Nothing in this section permits a primary constituent document to contain any provision proscribed by the organic statutes.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 232, § 22, effective May 29.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1912, § 4, effective July 1, 2020.

7-90-201.7. Statement of conversion - when conversion effective.

After the conversion of an entity is approved in accordance with section 7-90-201.4, the converting entity shall cause a statement of conversion to be delivered to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of this article, if the converting entity has a constituent filed document or a statement of foreign entity authority filed in the records of the secretary of state and the resulting entity will not be an entity for which a constituent filed document will be filed in the records of the secretary of state. The statement of conversion shall state:

The entity name of the converting entity, its principal office address, the jurisdiction under the law of which it is formed, and its form of entity;

The true name of the resulting entity, its principal address, the jurisdiction under the law of which it is formed, and its form of entity;

A statement that the converting entity has been converted into the resulting entity pursuant to this section; and

Any other matters relating to the conversion that the converting entity determines to include therein.

After the conversion of an entity is approved in accordance with section 7-90-201.4, if neither the resulting entity nor the converting entity is or will be an entity that will have a constituent filed document filed in the records of the secretary of state, either the resulting entity or the converting entity may deliver to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of this article 90, a statement of conversion stating:

The true name of the converting entity, its principal address, the jurisdiction under the law of which it is formed, and its form of entity;

The true name of the resulting entity, its principal address, the jurisdiction under the law of which it is formed, and its form of entity;

That the converting entity has been converted into the resulting entity pursuant to this section; and

Any other matters relating to the conversion that the entity filing the statement of conversion determines to include therein.

After the conversion of an entity is approved in accordance with section 7-90-201.4, if the resulting entity will be an entity for which a constituent filed document is to be filed in the records of the secretary of state, the converting entity shall deliver to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of this article 90, a combined statement of conversion and the constituent filed document that complies with the requirements of the organic statutes. In addition to complying with the requirements of the organic statutes for the constituent filed document, a combined statement of conversion and constituent filed document must state:

The entity name or, for an entity that has no entity name, the true name of the converting entity, its principal address, the jurisdiction under the law of which it is formed, and its form of entity;

The entity name of the resulting entity;

That the converting entity has been converted into the resulting entity pursuant to this section; and

Any other matters relating to the conversion that the entity filing the statement of conversion determines to include therein.

Notwithstanding the requirement in paragraph (a) of this subsection (3), a combined statement of conversion and constituent filed document, once accepted for filing by the secretary of state, shall for all purposes be deemed to be two separate documents: The statement of conversion and the constituent filed document.

The conversion shall become effective as specified by the organic statutes. If the organic statutes do not specify an effective date, the conversion shall become effective when the statement of conversion, if any, becomes effective as determined pursuant to section 7-90-304, or, if no statement of conversion is filed, the conversion shall become effective at the time and on the date determined by the owners of the converting entity.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 233, § 22, effective May 29.

L. 2019:

IP(2) and IP(3)(a) amended, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1913, § 5, effective July 1, 2020.

7-90-202. Effect of conversion - entity unchanged.

When a conversion takes effect, the converting entity is converted into the resulting entity, and the resulting entity is thereafter subject to all of the provisions of the organic statutes.

Unless otherwise agreed, the conversion of any converting entity into a resulting entity shall not be deemed to affect any obligations of the converting entity incurred prior to the conversion to the resulting entity or the personal liability of any person incurred prior to such conversion.

Unless otherwise agreed or otherwise provided by the organic statutes, other than this article, the converting entity shall not be required to wind up the entity's affairs or pay obligations and distribute the entity's assets, and the conversion shall not be deemed to constitute a dissolution of the converting entity and shall constitute a continuation of the existence of the converting entity in the form of the resulting entity.

The resulting entity is the same entity as the converting entity.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire part R&RE, p. 967, § 46, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(1) and (3) amended, p. 1472, § 204, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(1) amended, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1913, § 6, effective July 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-90-202 as it existed prior to 2000.

7-90-203. Merger of entities.

One or more domestic entities may merge into a domestic entity of a form the same as or different from any of the merging entities pursuant to a plan of merger complying with section 7-90-203.3 and approved pursuant to section 7-90-203.4.

One or more domestic entities may merge into a foreign entity of a form the same as or different from that of any of the merging entities, or one or more foreign entities may merge into a domestic entity of a form the same as or different from that of any of the merging entities, pursuant to a plan of merger complying with section 7-90-203.3 and approved, in the case of a domestic entity, pursuant to section 7-90-203.4, if:

The merger is not prohibited by the constituent documents or organic statutes of each foreign entity;

Each foreign entity complies with all of the requirements, if any, of its constituent documents and organic statutes in effecting the merger; and

Any foreign entity that is the surviving entity of the merger complies with section 7-90-204.5.

to (7) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2007, p. 235, § 23, effective May 29, 2007.)

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire part R&RE, p. 968, § 46, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

IP(5) amended, p. 1838, § 89, effective July 1; IP(5) amended, p. 1702, § 87, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(1), (2), (3), (4)(c)(II), (5), and (6) amended and (4)(c)(III) and (4)(c)(IV) added, p. 2286, § 196, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(2), (3)(a), (3)(b), (4)(c), (5), and (6) amended and (3)(f) added, p. 1472, § 205, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(5)(c) amended, p. 1206, § 6, effective October 1.

L. 2006:

(3)(a), (3)(b), (4)(b), (4)(c)(II)(B), (4)(c)(II)(D), and (5) amended, p. 868, § 44, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 235, § 23, effective May 29.

L. 2019:

(1) and (2) amended, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1914, § 7, effective July 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-90-203 as it existed prior to 2000.

7-90-203.1. Exchange of owner's interest.

One or more domestic entities may acquire all owner's interests of any other entity or all of one or more classes, series, or types, in exchange for owner's interests or other securities, obligations, rights to acquire owner's interests, or other securities, cash, property, or any combination pursuant to a plan of exchange complying with section 7-90-203.3 and approved pursuant to section 7-90-203.4.

A foreign entity may be party to an exchange pursuant to a plan of exchange complying with section 7-90-203.3 and approved, in the case of a domestic entity, pursuant to section 7-90-203.4, if:

The exchange is not prohibited by the constituent documents or organic statutes of the foreign entity;

The foreign entity complies with all of the requirements, if any, of its constituent documents and organic statutes in effecting the exchange; and

Any foreign entity that is the acquiring entity in the exchange complies with section 7-90-204.5.

This section does not limit the power of a domestic entity to acquire the owner's interests of any other entity in a transaction other than an exchange.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1914, § 8, effective July 1, 2020.

L. 2022:

(1) and (3) amended, (HB 22-1250), ch. 80, p. 396, § 2, effective August 10.

7-90-203.3. Plan of merger - plan of exchange.

A plan of merger must state:

The entity name or, for an entity that has no entity name, the true name, the jurisdiction under the law of which the entity is formed, and the form of entity of each of the merging entities;

The entity name or, for an entity that has no entity name, the true name, the jurisdiction under the law of which the entity is formed, and the form of the surviving entity into which the merging entities are to merge;

The terms and conditions of the merger, including the manner and basis of changing the owner's interests of each merging entity into owner's interests or obligations of the surviving entity or into money or other property in whole or in part; and

Any amendments to the constituent documents of the surviving entity to be effected by the merger.

A plan of exchange must state:

The entity name of each party to the exchange;

The terms and conditions of the exchange; and

The manner and basis of exchanging the owner's interests to be acquired.

The plan of exchange may state other provisions relating to the exchange.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 238, § 24, effective May 29.

L. 2019:

(2) added, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1915, § 9, effective July 1, 2020.

L. 2022:

IP(1), (1)(c), and (2)(a)(III) amended, (HB 22-1250), ch. 80, p. 397, § 3, effective August 10.

7-90-203.4. Approval of plan of merger or exchange.

In the case of domestic entities described in this subsection (1), the plan of merger or plan of exchange must, if required, be approved:

In the case of a corporation, as provided in section 7-111-103;

In the case of a nonprofit corporation, as provided in section 7-131-102 for merger; except that, if the transaction is an owner's interest exchange and the primary constituent documents expressly provide for the approval of a plan of exchange, the transaction must be approved in accordance with those provisions;

In the case of a cooperative formed under, or subject to, article 56 of this title 7, as provided in section 7-56-602 for approval of a plan of merger, conversion, consolidation, or share or equity capital exchange;

In the case of a cooperative formed under article 55 of this title 7, as provided in section 7-55-112 for merger; except that, if the transaction is an owner's interest exchange and the primary constituent documents expressly provide for the approval of a plan of exchange, the transaction must be approved in accordance with those provisions; and

In the case of a cooperative formed under article 58 of this title 7, as provided in section 7-58-1606 for merger; except that, if the transaction is an owner's interest exchange and the primary constituent documents expressly provide for the approval of a plan of exchange, the transaction must be approved in accordance with those provisions.

In the case of a domestic entity other than an entity described in subsection (1) of this section, the plan of merger or plan of exchange must be approved as follows:

If the primary constituent documents expressly provide for the approval of the plan of merger or plan of exchange, in accordance with the respective provisions of the primary constituent documents;

If the primary constituent documents do not expressly provide for approval:

Of a plan of merger but do provide for approval of a plan of exchange, then a plan of merger is governed by the approval requirements for a plan of exchange; and

Of a plan of exchange but do provide for approval of a plan of merger, then a plan of exchange is governed by the approval requirements for a plan of merger;

If subsections (2)(a) and (2)(b) of this section do not apply because the primary constituent documents do not expressly provide for the approval of a plan of merger or a plan of exchange, in accordance with the provisions of the entity's organic statutes that contain the most stringent terms for approval of the other type of transaction in this section;

If subsections (2)(a), (2)(b), and (2)(c) of this section do not apply, in accordance with the provisions of the entity's organic statutes that contain the most stringent terms for approval of an amendment to the primary constituent documents or, if no such provisions exist, the provisions of the organic statutes that contain the most stringent terms for the approval of an amendment to the primary constituent documents; or

If subsections (2)(a), (2)(b), (2)(c), and (2)(d) of this section do not apply, by all of the owners of the merging entity.

For purposes of this section, the provisions of the organic statutes and constituent documents applicable to approval include provisions relating to any preliminary approval by managers for submission to the owners, notices, quorum, voting, and consent by owners or third parties. References in this section to the most stringent provisions of the primary constituent documents or organic statutes are references to those provisions of the documents or statutes that establish the highest voting requirements.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to permit a primary constituent document to contain any provision that is proscribed by the organic statutes.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 238, § 24, effective May 29.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1915, § 10, effective July 1, 2020.

7-90-203.7. Statement of merger - when merger effective.

After a merger is approved in accordance with section 7-90-203, if any merging entity is an entity for which a constituent filed document has been filed by the secretary of state, the surviving entity shall deliver to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of this article 90, a statement of merger that states:

The entity name or, for an entity that has no entity name, the true name of each merging entity, its principal address, the jurisdiction under the law of which it is formed, and its form of entity;

The entity name or, for an entity that has no entity name, the true name of the surviving entity, its principal address, the jurisdiction under the law of which it is formed, and its form of entity;

That each merging entity is merged into the surviving entity;

That, if the plan of merger provides for amendments to any constituent filed document of the surviving entity, an appropriate statement of change or other document effecting the amendments shall be delivered to the secretary of state for filing pursuant to part 3 of this article; and

Any other matters relating to the merger the surviving entity determines to include therein.

After a merger is approved in accordance with section 7-90-203, if no merging entity is an entity for which a constituent filed document has been filed by the secretary of state, the surviving entity may deliver to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of this article 90, a statement of merger that states:

The entity name or, for an entity that has no entity name, the true name of each merging entity, its principal address, the jurisdiction under the law of which it is formed, and its form of entity;

The entity name or, for an entity that has no entity name, the true name of the surviving entity, its principal address, the jurisdiction under the law of which it is formed, and its form of entity;

That each merging entity is merged into the surviving entity; and

Any other matters relating to the merger that the surviving entity determines to include therein.

The merger shall become effective as specified by the organic statutes. If the organic statutes do not specify an effective date, the merger takes effect at the time and on the date the statement of merger becomes effective as determined pursuant to section 7-90-304 or, if no statement of merger is required to be filed, at the time and on the date determined by the owners of the merging entity.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 239, § 24, effective May 29.

L. 2013:

IP(1) and IP(2) amended, (HB 13-1300), ch. 316, p. 1663, § 9, effective August 7.

L. 2019:

IP(1) and IP(2) amended, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1917, § 11, effective July 1, 2020.

7-90-203.8. Statement of owner's interest exchange.

After a plan of exchange is approved pursuant to section 7-90-203.4, the acquiring entity shall deliver to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of this article 90, a statement of owner's interest exchange stating:

The entity name of each entity whose owner's interests will be acquired, and the principal office address of its principal office;

The entity name of the acquiring entity and the principal office address of its principal office; and

A statement that the acquiring entity acquires owner's interest of the other entity or entities.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added with relocations, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1917, § 12, effective July 1, 2020.

L. 2020:

(1)(c) amended, (HB 20-1402), ch. 216, p. 1041, § 7, effective June 30.

L. 2022:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 22-1250), ch. 80, p. 397, § 4, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-111-105 (1) as it existed prior to July 1, 2020.

7-90-204. Effect of merger.

When a merger takes effect:

Every merging entity merges into the surviving entity and the separate existence of every merging entity ceases. All of the rights, privileges, including specifically the attorney-client privilege, and powers of each of the merging entities; all real, personal, and mixed property; and all obligations due to each of the merging entities, as well as all other things and causes of action of each of the merging entities, vest as a matter of law in the surviving entity and are thereafter the rights, privileges, powers, and property of, and obligations due to, the surviving entity. Title to any property vested in any of the merging entities does not revert and is not in any way impaired by reason of the merger; except that all rights of creditors in and all liens upon any property of any of the merging entities are preserved unimpaired in the same property, however held. All obligations of the merging entities attach as a matter of law to the surviving entity and may be fully enforced against the surviving entity. A merger does not constitute a conveyance, transfer, or assignment. Nothing in this section affects the validity of contract provisions or of reversions or other forms of title limitations that attach conditions or consequences specifically to mergers.

Any owner who was liable for the obligation of any merging entity solely by reason of being an owner of the merging entity, but who will otherwise not be liable for the obligation of the surviving entity, remains liable for the obligations of the merging entity incurred before the merger unless a contract giving rise to the obligation provides otherwise.

Unless otherwise provided in the constituent documents or required under the organic statutes, no merging entity shall be required to wind up its affairs or pay obligations and distribute assets, and the merger shall not be deemed to constitute a dissolution or liquidation of the merging entity. Unless otherwise provided in the constituent documents of a constituent entity or as required under the organic statutes, any payments in cash or in kind to owners of the constituent entity pursuant to the plan of merger shall not be deemed to constitute a dividend, liquidating distribution, or other distribution that gives rise to contractual distributional preference rights.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire part R&RE, p. 969, § 46, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(1)(c) amended, p. 1474, § 206, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1207, § 7, effective October 1.

L. 2015:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 15-1071), ch. 28, p. 69, § 1, effective September 1.

L. 2019:

IP(1) and (1)(a) amended, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1917, § 13, effective July 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-90-204 as it existed prior to 2000.

7-90-204.3. Effect of an exchange.

When an exchange takes effect, the owner's interests of each acquired entity are exchanged as provided in the plan, and the former holders of the owner's interests are entitled only to the exchange rights provided in the statement of owner's interest exchange or to their rights under the organic statutes.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added with relocations, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1918, § 14, effective July 1, 2020.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1250), ch. 80, p. 397, § 5, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-111-106 (2) as it existed prior to July 1, 2020.

7-90-204.5. Foreign entity resulting from conversion or surviving merger.

Upon a conversion of a domestic entity into a foreign entity, a merger of a domestic entity and a foreign entity in which the foreign entity is the surviving entity, or an exchange between a domestic entity and a foreign entity in which the foreign entity is the acquiring entity, the foreign entity:

Shall either:

Appoint a registered agent if the foreign entity has no registered agent and maintain a registered agent pursuant to part 7 of this article 90, whether or not the foreign entity is otherwise required to do so, to accept service in any proceeding to enforce any obligation or rights of shareholders seeking appraisal rights in any domestic entity party to the conversion, merger, or exchange or in any proceeding based on a cause of action arising with respect to any domestic entity party to the conversion, merger, or exchange; or

Be deemed to have authorized service of process on it in connection with such causes of action by mailing in accordance with section 7-90-704 (2);

Shall promptly pay to shareholders seeking appraisal rights in each domestic entity party to the conversion, merger, or exchange the amount, if any, to which they are entitled under the organic statutes; and

Shall comply with part 8 of this article 90 if it is to transact business or conduct activities in this state.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 1474, § 207, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(1)(a)(I) amended, p. 869, § 45, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(1)(a)(I) amended, p. 240, § 25, effective May 29.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1918, § 15, effective July 1, 2020.

7-90-205. Scope of article - article not exclusive - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire part R&RE, p. 970, § 46, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(2) added by revision, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, pp. 1919, 1966, §§ 16, 72.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2020. (See L. 2019, pp. 1919, 1966.)

7-90-205.5. Abandonment or amendment of plan of merger, plan of conversion, or plan of exchange.

After a plan of merger, a plan of conversion, or a plan of exchange is authorized, and at any time before the merger, conversion, or exchange takes effect:

The transaction may be abandoned, subject to any contractual rights, in accordance with the procedure stated in the plan of merger, plan of conversion, or plan of exchange. If a merger, conversion, or exchange is abandoned after a plan of merger has been filed by the secretary of state pursuant to section 7-90-203.7, a plan of conversion has been filed by the secretary of state pursuant to section 7-90-201.7, or a plan of exchange has been filed by the secretary of state pursuant to section 7-90-203.8 stating a delayed effective date, the transaction may be prevented from becoming effective by delivering to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of this article 90, before the date the transaction becomes effective pursuant to section 7-90-304, a statement of change that states that, by appropriate action, the transaction has been abandoned.

The plan of merger, plan of conversion, or plan of exchange may be amended in accordance with the procedure stated in the plan, but the plan may not be amended to change:

The amount or kind of owner's interests or other securities, eligible interests, obligations, rights to acquire owner's interests, other securities or eligible interests, cash, or other property to be received under the plan by the owners of eligible interests in any party to the merger, conversion, or exchange;

The primary constituent documents of an entity that is party to the merger, conversion, or exchange, except for changes permitted by the organic statutes of the entity; or

Any of the other terms or conditions of the plan if the change would adversely affect the owners in any material respect.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p.1919, § 17, effective July 1, 2020.

L. 2022:

(1)(b)(I) amended, (HB 22-1250), ch. 80, p. 397, § 6, effective August 10.

7-90-206. Appraisal rights, prohibitions, restrictions, and requirements.

To the extent that any organic statute or the common law expressly prohibits or restricts the right of any entity to convert into any other form of entity or merge with or be party to an exchange with any other entity, grants appraisal rights with respect to the merger, conversion, or exchange, or imposes any requirement on the conversion, merger, or exchange, any merger, conversion, or exchange of the entity under this part 2 is subject to the restriction, entitles its owners to the appraisal rights, and is subject to the requirement.

If the primary constituent documents or organic statutes do not provide an owner of a converting entity, merging entity, or entity party to an exchange with appraisal rights or do not expressly deny an owner of a converting entity, merging entity, or entity party to an exchange with appraisal rights, but an owner would be entitled under the organic statutes or primary constituent documents to appraisal rights if the entity were merged into an entity of the same form as the converting or acquiring entity, were party to an exchange with an entity of the same form as the converting or surviving entity, or were converted into an entity of the same form as the acquiring or surviving entity, then the owner is entitled to appraisal rights with respect to the conversion, merger, or exchange:

On the same basis as the owner would be so entitled under the organic statutes or primary constituent documents if the entity were being merged into an entity of the same form as the converting or acquiring entity;

If no provisions specified in subsection (2)(a) of this section exist, on the same basis as the owner would be so entitled under the organic statutes or primary constituent documents if the entity were party to an exchange with an entity of the same form as the converting or acquiring entity; or

If no provisions specified in subsections (2)(a) and (2)(b) of this section exist, on the same basis as the owner would be so entitled under the organic statutes or primary constituent documents if the entity were being converted into an entity of the same form as the surviving or acquiring entity.

Unless otherwise provided in the plan of conversion, plan of merger, or plan of exchange, an owner of an entity that is converted into another form of entity or merged into any other entity, or whose owner's interest is exchanged with another entity pursuant to an owner's interest exchange who consents to the conversion, merger, or exchange, or, in a transaction in which appraisal rights are applicable, who does not consent to the conversion, merger, or exchange and who does not exercise appraisal rights becomes an owner of the resulting or surviving entity and shall be deemed to be a party to, and to be bound by, the constituent operating document of the resulting or surviving entity.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire part R&RE, p. 970, § 46, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 870, § 46, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(3) added, p. 241, § 26, effective May 29.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1919, § 18, effective July 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-90-206 as it existed prior to 2000.